Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1152.
do enact as follows:SB1152,11Section 1. 196.027 (1) (d) 3. of the statutes is created to read:SB1152,2,32196.027 (1) (d) 3. The retiring of any existing facility, as defined in s. 196.491 3(1) (e).SB1152,24Section 2. 196.027 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1152,2,135196.027 (1) (f) “Environmental control cost” means capital cost, including 6capitalized cost relating to regulatory assets, incurred or expected to be incurred by 7an energy utility in undertaking an environmental control activity and, with 8respect to an environmental control activity described in par. (d) 2. or 3., includes 9the unrecovered value of property that is retired, including any demolition or 10similar cost that exceeds the salvage value of the property. “Environmental control 11cost” does not include any monetary penalty, fine, or forfeiture assessed against an 12energy utility by a government agency or court under a federal or state 13environmental statute, rule, or regulation.SB1152,31Section 3. 196.027 (3) (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1152,3,22196.027 (3) (title) Exceptions to commission Commission jurisdiction.SB1152,43Section 4. 196.027 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1152,3,134196.027 (3) (b) The Except as provided in par. (c), the commission may not 5order or otherwise directly or indirectly require an energy utility to use 6environmental trust bonds to finance any project, addition, plant, facility, 7extension, capital improvement, environmental control equipment, retirement, or 8any other expenditure, unless, except as provided in sub. (2) (c), the energy utility 9has made an application under sub. (2) (a) to finance such expenditure using 10environmental trust bonds. The commission may not refuse to allow an energy 11utility to recover costs for environmental control activities in an otherwise 12permissible fashion solely because of the potential availability of environmental 13trust financing.SB1152,514Section 5. 196.027 (3) (c) of the statutes is created to read:SB1152,3,1915196.027 (3) (c) The commission may order or require an energy utility to use 16environmental trust bonds to finance the retirement of a facility, as defined in s. 17196.491 (1) (e), if the facility is retired before the full value of the facility is 18recovered and if the commission determines that the order or requirement is in the 19public interest.SB1152,620Section 6. 196.491 (3) (d) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1152,3,2421196.491 (3) (d) (intro.) Except as provided under par. pars. (ds) and (e), the 22commission shall approve an application filed under par. (a) 1. for a certificate of 23public convenience and necessity only if the commission determines all of the 24following:SB1152,71Section 7. 196.491 (3) (ds) of the statutes is created to read:SB1152,4,32196.491 (3) (ds) 1. In this paragraph, “very large customer” means a customer 3of an electric public utility that has a load of at least 75 megawatts. SB1152,4,642. The commission shall determine whether a facility proposed by a public 5utility in an application filed under par. (a) 1. will primarily serve the load of a very 6large customer.SB1152,4,1273. If the commission determines under subd. 2. that a facility proposed by a 8public utility in an application filed under par. (a) 1. will primarily serve the load of 9a very large customer, the commission shall reject the application unless the 10commission orders or requires the public utility to obtain a financing order under s. 11196.027 for the unrecovered value of the facility if the facility is retired before the 12full value of the facility is recovered.SB1152,813Section 8. Initial applicability.SB1152,4,1614(1) Certificates of public convenience and necessity. The treatment of 15s. 196.491 (3) (d) (intro.) and (ds) first applies to a certificate of public convenience 16and necessity issued under s. 196.491 (3) on the effective date of this subsection.SB1152,4,1717